District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.23

Board of directors — Meetings.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 274, Pub. L. 87-569, § 23
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-24, § 2, 28 DCR 2618
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.23.
1981 Ed., § 29-523.
1973 Ed., § 29-1023.